Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2824
Graduate pharmacy education or approved program, defined.

Graduate pharmacy education or approved program means a period of supervised educational training by a graduate of an accredited school or college of pharmacy, which training has been approved by the board.

Laws 1978, LB 675, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 456;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 116;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.19;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 920.